Hawaii, session 2026, HB1975.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the state rent supplement program for kupuna administered by the Hawaii public housing authority has helped prevent some of the State's vulnerable elderly residents from facing eviction and becoming homeless. In total, the program has provided about three hundred at-risk kupuna with monthly rental assistance of less than $500 per month.  In 2024, the legislature funded the program with $1,000,000 and in 2025, the legislature extended the program's sunset date from 2026 to 2028.  The legislature believes that the program should now be made permanent. The legislature further finds that the initial appropriation has been nearly exhausted and that supplemental funding is necessary to sustain the program. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Make the state rent supplement program for kupuna permanent; and (2)  Appropriate funds for the program and for positions to support the program. SECTION 2.  Act 98, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, as amended by Act 282, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, is amended by amending section 6 to read as follows: "SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2023[, and shall be repealed on June 30, 2028]." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $110,160 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of two full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE) permanent public housing specialist II positions within the Hawaii public housing authority to support the state rent supplement program for kupuna. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii public housing authority for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,160,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the state rent supplement program for kupuna; provided that the funds appropriated under this section shall be in addition to the base budget of the Hawaii public housing authority for the state rent supplement program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii public housing authority for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________